Louisiana, session 2026, SB263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1720 and 1720.1 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1720. Owner notification of a stored vehicle; right to request administrative
hearing
A. Within five business days of obtaining a vehicle, the owner of the
towing, storage, or parking facility shall perform a good faith effort to establish
the state of registration and title of a vehicle that has been stored by an
examination of all of the following:
(1) Louisiana Office of Motor Vehicles' database for the owner and any
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-515 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 263
lienholders.
(2) When there is not a current registration record for the vehicle on file
with the department, the electronic National Motor Vehicle Title Information
System, or an equivalent commercially- available system; to determine the state
of registration.
(3) The vehicle for any type of tag, tag record, temporary tag, regular
tag, an inspection sticker or other stickers and decals that may indicate a state
of possible registration.
(4) When there is no address of the owner on the impound report or
when the vehicle was towed at the request of a law enforcement officer, the law
enforcement report to determine whether an out-of-state address is indicated
from driver's license information, a tag number, or other information
identifying the vehicle.
(5) When it is a private tow, the trip sheet or tow ticket of the tow truck
operator to determine whether a tag was on the vehicle at the beginning of the
tow.
(6) The interior of the vehicle for any papers that may be in the glove
box, trunk, or other areas for the state of registration.
A.B. Within ten seven business days from the date the department or its
authorized agent sends the owner information of the stored vehicle, which includes
information regarding the holder of any lien on the vehicle, to the owner of the
towing, storage, or parking facility, the owner of the towing, storage, or parking
facility shall send notice with a certificate of mailing to the owner of the vehicle at
the owner's last known address and to the holder of any lien on the vehicle. If the
department or its authorized agent sends the owner information electronically, the
owner of the towing, storage, or parking facility shall send notice within five
business days.
B.C. The notice required in Subsection A B of this Section shall include the
following information:
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-515 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 263
(1) The name, location, and physical and mailing addresses of the storage or
parking facility.
(2) A description of the vehicle including the year, make, model, and vehicle
identification number.
(3) The vehicle license plate number, state of issuance, and expiration date,
if known.
(4) The name of the person or agency that had the vehicle towed or placed
in storage.
(5) The date the vehicle was placed in storage and any applicable adjusted
storage dates.
(6) The condition of the vehicle.
(7) All outstanding charges against the stored vehicle.
(8) Notice of the right of the owner and holder of any lien on the vehicle to
an administrative hearing as required in R.S. 32:1727. The notice shall contain the
deadline for requesting an administrative hearing and shall also contain information
regarding the date by which the request for an administrative hearing shall be mailed
by certified mail, return receipt requested.
D. Failure to make good faith efforts to comply with the notice
requirements of this Section precludes the imposition of any storage charges
against the vehicle.
§1720.1. Surrender of stored vehicle to owner or lienholder
A. When surrendering a stored vehicle, a towing-storage operator shall
accept an original or a copy of any of the following documents as evidence of a
person's interest in a vehicle:
(1) An electronic title.
(2) A paper title.
(3) A contract between a lender and the owner of the vehicle.
(4) A contract between a lessor and the lessee of the vehicle.
(5) Credentials establishing the person as an employee or contract agent
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-515 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 263
of an insurance company along with documentation identifying the vehicle by
the vehicle identification number.
(6) A written agreement evidencing that the person is an agent of the
vehicle owner or lienholder.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if a vehicle
placed in a storage facility or a repair or body shop is encumbered by a lien, and the
storage or repair or body shop operator mails the notification required by R.S.
32:1720, the storage or repair or body shop operator shall surrender possession of the
vehicle to the holder of any lien on the vehicle on behalf of the registered owner. The
holder of any lien on the vehicle is the holder shown on the records of the office of
motor vehicles. No such surrender shall occur until the secured party makes a
complete payment of the towing and storage charges and executes a hold harmless
agreement, agreeing to indemnify the storage or repair or body shop operator for
surrender of the vehicle to the secured party.
C. Upon surrendering the vehicle, a towing-storage operator shall
provide an itemized invoice containing all of the following information:
(1) The date and time the vehicle was towed.
(2) The location to which the vehicle was towed.
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the towing-storage
operator.
(4) A description of the towed vehicle, including the color, make, model,
model year, and vehicle identification number.
(5) The license plate number and state of registration for the towed
vehicle.
(6) The cost of the initial towing service.
(7) The cost of any storage fees, expressed as a daily rate.
(8) Other fees, including administrative fees, vehicle search fees, fees for
hazardous material and nonhazardous material cleanup, and fees for labor.
(9) A list of the services that were performed under a warranty or that
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-515 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 263
were otherwise performed at no cost to the owner of the vehicle.
D. A towing-storage operator shall permit vehicle owners, lienholders,
insurance company representatives, or their agents, whose interest in the vehicle
is evidenced by any of the documents listed in Subsection A of this Section, to
inspect the towed vehicle and shall release to the owner, lienholder, or agent the
vehicle all personal property not affixed to the vehicle which was in the vehicle
at the time the vehicle came into the custody of the towing-storage operator. The
inspection and release of the vehicle shall be permitted within one hour after the
owner, lienholder, insurance company representative, or their agent presents
any of the documents listed in Subsection A of this Section to the towing-storage
operator during normal business hours at the site where the vehicle is stored.
E. Notwithstanding Paragraph (A)(6) of this Subsection, a rental vehicle
agreement is not evidence that the person who rented a vehicle is an agent of the
rental vehicle owner for the purpose of releasing the vehicle. However, a
towing-storage operator shall release to the renter of a rental vehicle all
personal property belonging to the renter which is not affixed to the rental
vehicle within one hour after the renter's arrival.